Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 2. Federal Licensing

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d Aviation §§ 13 to 26.

2A C.J.S. Aeronautics and Aerospace §§ 35 to 56.

§ 10-4-201.
Federal license and registration of aircraft required.

Public safety and aeronautical progress require uniformity of regulation. Aircraft operating within this state should conform with respect to design, construction and airworthiness to the standards prescribed by the United States government with respect to navigation of aircraft subject to its jurisdiction. It is unlawful to navigate an aircraft within the state unless it is licensed and registered by the department of transportation of the United States in the prescribed manner.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 4-102; C.S. 1945, § 33-202; W.S. 1957, § 10-28; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-102; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

§ 10-4-202.
Federal pilot's license required.

Public safety and the advantages of uniform regulations require that a person navigating the aircraft described in W.S.

10-4-201

in any form of navigation for which license to operate the aircraft would be required by the United States government shall have the qualifications necessary for obtaining and holding the class of license required by the United States government. It is unlawful for any person to engage in operating an aircraft within this state in any form of navigation unless he has the appropriate pilot’s license issued by the federal government.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 4-103; C.S. 1945, § 33-203; W.S. 1957, § 10-29; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-103; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Revocation or suspension of license or certificate of airman, 78 ALR2d 1150.

Validity of Federal Aviation Administration regulations (14 CFR §§ 67.13, 67.15, 67.17) prescribing standards for issuance of medical certificates to airmen, 59 ALR Fed 682.

§ 10-4-203.
Display of pilot's license.

The certificate of the license required shall be kept in the personal possession of the licensee when he is operating aircraft within this state. The license must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, any official of the United States department of transportation, any peace officer of this state, or any person in charge of any airport or landing field in this state upon which he shall land.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 4-104; C.S. 1945, § 33-204; W.S. 1957, § 10-30; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-104; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.